Utah statutes.
78B-3-902.   Pilot project -- Rules and procedures.

The Judicial Council shall by rule create and provide procedures for a pilot project for expedited jury trials in civil actions.

(1)  The program shall comply with all constitutional and statutory requirements for jury trials.

(2)  All parties to an action shall agree to participation in an expedited jury trial.

(3)  Any matters not expressly addressed in this part, in the implementing rules of the court, or in an agreement authorized by this part, are governed by applicable statutes and rules governing civil actions.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 2011 General Session

